California, session 20252026, AB1473.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 3439.10 of the Civil Code is amended to read:3439.10. (a) In this section, the following rules determine a debtor’s location:(1) A debtor who is an individual is located at the individual’s principal residence. residence or domicile.(2) A debtor that is an organization and has only one place of business is located at its place of business.(3) A debtor that is an organization and has more than one place of business is located at its chief executive office.(b) A claim in the nature of a claim under this chapter is governed by the local law of the jurisdiction in which the debtor is located when the transfer is made or the obligation is incurred.